Utah statutes.
53A-20b-103.   State Charter School Finance Authority created -- Members --
Compensation -- Services.
(1)  There is created a body politic and corporate known as the State Charter
School Finance Authority.  The authority is created to provide an efficient
and cost-effective method of financing charter school facilities.
(2)  The governing board of the authority shall be composed of:
(a)  the governor or the governor's designee;
(b)  the state treasurer; and
(c)  the state superintendent of public instruction or the state
superintendent's designee.
(3) (a) (i)  A member who is not a government employee may not receive
compensation or benefits for the member's services, but may receive per diem
and expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties at
the rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  A member may decline to receive per diem and expenses for the member's
service.
(b) (i)  A state government officer or employee member who does not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from the agency the member represents for the
member's service may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance
of the member's official duties at the rates established by the Division of
Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  A state government officer or employee member may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for the member's service.
(4)  Upon request, the State Board of Education shall provide staff support to
the authority.
